Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2428.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 703(b) of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended, subsections (c) and (d) are amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 703. Education and training programs.* * *(a.1) Optional fee.--Municipalities administering and enforcing this act under section 501(a) may, by ordinance, 1234567891011121314151617181920 assess a fee not to exceed $10 on each residential construction or building permit.(b) Accounts.--There are hereby established within the State Treasury [three] four restricted accounts which shall be known as the Municipal Code Official Training Account, the Review and Advisory Council Administration Account [and], the Construction Contractor Training Account and the Residential Construction Workforce Training Account.(c) Deposit.--* * *(4) The fee collected as authorized under subsection (a.1) shall be transmitted quarterly to the State Treasury and shall be deposited into the Residential Construction Workforce Training Account. Money in the Residential Construction Workforce Training Account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of awarding grants under section 703.1.(d) Reports.--* * *(3) No later than November 1 of each calendar year, the department shall provide a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall detail expenditures for the most recent fiscal year. The report shall include a separate accounting of revenue and expenditures under subsection (c)(4). The separate accounting under this paragraph shall include, to the extent available:(i) Fees deposited into the Residential Construction 20260HB2428PN3234 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Workforce Training Account . (ii) Grants awarded under the Residential Construction Workforce Training Grant Program.(iii) Geographic distribution of grants awarded under the Residential Construction Workforce Training Grant Program.(iv) Workforce outcomes of grants awarded under the Residential Construction Workforce Training Grant Program.(v) The amount utilized by the department for personnel, including the position title, hours charged, amount and description of the duties and responsibilities of each individual paid in whole or in part from the Residential Construction Workforce Training Account.(vi) The amount utilized by the department for operational costs and a description of each expenditure.(vii) The amount utilized by the department for other Residential Construction Workforce Training Grant Program purposes and a description of each expenditure.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 703.1. Residential Construction Workforce Training Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Residential Construction Workforce Training Grant Program is established within the department.(b) Award of grants.--(1) The department shall award grants to the extent that money is available in the account for the purpose of addressing skilled labor shortages impacting the residential housing construction needs of the Commonwealth.(2) Grants shall be awarded to nonprofit organizations, 20260HB2428PN3234 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 educational institutions, career and technical education providers, registered apprenticeship or preapprenticeship programs, workforce development organizations or units of local government.(3) Grant awards shall be used for construction workforce training, apprenticeships, tools, equipment and instructional materials, including transportation assistance and stipends, funded in whole or in part by the fee.(4) Grant awards shall be directed to the building of more residential units in this Commonwealth in the county from which the fee originated.(c) Prioritization.--The department shall prioritize grant awards within a county or municipality in which a fee is collected.(d) Guidelines.--In addition to the reporting requirements under section 703(d), the department shall administer the account and shall establish guidelines, application procedures and reporting requirements necessary to implement this section.(e) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Residential Construction Workforce Training Account established under section 703(b)."Fee." The optional fee imposed under section 703(a.1).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2428PN3234 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425